Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-8-102, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 310, O.S.L. 2022 (10A O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-8-102), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-8-102. A. Any court-appointed special advocate
(CASA) available for appointment pursuant to the Oklahoma Children's
Code or the Oklahoma Juvenile Code shall complete education and
training courses in accordance with national and Oklahoma CASA
standards.
B. No court-appointed special advocate shall be assigned a case
before:
1. Completing a training program in compliance with nationally
documented Court-Appointed Special Advocate standards.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4341 Page 1

Docu mentation of training shall be submitted annually by local
court-appointed special advocate programs to the Oklahoma Court-
Appointed Special Advocate Association; and
2. Being approved by the local court-appointed special advocate
program, which will include appropriate criminal background checks
as provided in subsection C of this section.
C. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each local
court-appointed special advocate program shall require for any
person making application to become a court-appointed special
advocate volunteer or to be employed by the local court-appointed
special advocate program:
a. a child welfare records search conducted by the
Department of Human Services, which shall consist of a
search of the Child Abuse and Neglect Information
System maintained by the Department of Human Services
for review by authorized entities,
b. a criminal history records search conducted by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, and
c. any other background check meeting the requirements as
set forth in Oklahoma Court-Appointed Special Advocate
Association state or national standards for local
programs.
2. If the prospective court-appointed special advocate
volunteer or employee of the local court-appointed special advocate
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4341 Page 2

prog ram has lived in Oklahoma for less than one (1) year, a criminal
history records search shall also be obtained from the criminal
history state repository of the previous state of residence.
D. 1. Any person participating in a judicial proceeding as a
court-appointed special advocate shall be presumed prima facie to be
acting in good faith and in so doing shall be immune from any civil
liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed.
2. Any person serving in a management position of a court-
appointed special advocate organization, including a member of the
Board of Directors acting in good faith, shall be immune from any
civil liability or any vicarious liability for the negligence of any
court-appointed special advocate organization advocates, managers,
or directors.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate


ENGR. H. B. NO. 4341 Page 3